Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-180
National Guard; encampment; commanding officer; powers; duties.

The commanding officer of any encampment or training assembly may cause those under his command to perform any camp or field duties he may require. He may put under arrest during such encampment or training assembly any member of his command who may disobey a superior officer, or be guilty of disorderly or unmilitary conduct, or any other person who may trespass upon the encampment grounds or training assembly, or molest the orderly discharge of duty by members of his command.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 41, p. 379;

R.S.1913, § 3941;

C.S.1922, § 3341;

C.S.1929, § 55-168;

R.S.1943, § 55-155;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 78, p. 1606.